Washington statutes.
RCW 41.68.020

Eligibility for reparation.

Any state employee or the living surviving spouse of a state employee who, due to the promulgation of federal Executive Order 9066, was dismissed, terminated from a temporary position, or rejected during the person's probationary period, or who voluntarily resigned in lieu of dismissal from state government employment, and who incurred salary losses as a result thereof, is eligible to file a claim with the state for the reparation of those losses.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 15 s 2.]